Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Environmental Quality, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Air quality.................................  $ 13,133,452
(2) Water quality............................  $ 26,136,733
(3) Land quality..............................  $ 1,136,036
(4) Agency management.................  $ 750,000
(5) Debt service ..............................  $ 3,824,980
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the
proceeds of bonds for the  Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation
and air quality grants, drinking water protection, beach bacteria monitoring,  laboratory ac-
creditation and woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring laboratory services,  but exclud-
ing lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section, collected or received by the
Department of Environmental Quality, for the following purposes:
(1) Air quality................................. $ 54,046,098
(2) Water quality ............................ $ 24,913,696
(3) Land quality.............................. $ 66,217,299
(4) Agency management ................. $ 27,687,657
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,687,925 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Parks and Natural Resources
Fund to the Department  of Environmental Quality for activities and projects to implement
Article XV, section 4 (8), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the following  expenditures by the
Department of Environmental Quality are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for debt service and debt  service administrative costs related to the
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and the Pollution Control Fund; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 1
(2) Expenditures made for loans from  the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and
loans from the Pollution Control Fund.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2017 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Environmental Quality, for the following purposes:
(1) Air quality................................. $ 10,189,385
(2) Water quality ............................ $ 11,522,064
(3) Land quality.............................. $ 7,343,708
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 2